District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.56

Powers.

(a)

All offices, agencies, and instrumentalities of the District government shall fully cooperate with the Commission and provide requested information and documents.

(b)

Subject to the availability of appropriations, the Commission may hire or contract for necessary staff and technical assistance or may require any office, agency, or instrumentality of the District government to provide such assistance.

Mar 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1156
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-295, § 2(b), 54 DCR 1092